LV3.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun

vēj N1deklš;
mak N1dekls;
papīr N1dekls;
tirg N3dekl;
med N3dekl;
liet N3dekl;
piekab N5deklj;
bild N5deklj;
ast N5dekl;
akmen N2dekl;

LEXICON N1deklš					
+N+Sg+Nom:^š  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;

LEXICON N1dekls					
+N+Sg+Nom:^s  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;

LEXICON N3dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^us  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^us # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^um # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ū # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;

LEXICON N5deklj
+N+Sg+Nom:^e  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^Mu # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs # ;


LEXICON N5dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^e  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^es # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ei # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ē # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^es  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ēm # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^es # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ēs # ;

LEXICON N2dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^is  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^Ma # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^im # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^Mi  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^Miem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^Mus # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^Mos # ;
